Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-138
Inspection of business by department.

The department may inspect or provide for the inspection of any business credentialed or applying for a credential under the Uniform Credentialing Act. The department shall issue an inspection report and provide a copy of the report to the business within ten working days after the completion of an inspection.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 38.